Utah statutes.
73-3b-202.   Issuance of recharge permit -- Criteria -- Conditions.
The state engineer:
(1)  shall issue a recharge permit if:
(a)  the applicant has:
(i)  the technical and financial capability to construct and operate the
recharge project; and
(ii) (A)  a valid water right for the use of the water proposed to be
artificially recharged; or
(B)  an agreement to use the water proposed to be artificially recharged with
a person who has a valid water right for the use of the water proposed to be
artificially recharged; and
(b)  the project:
(i)  is hydrologically feasible;
(ii)  will not cause unreasonable harm to land;
(iii)  will not impair any existing water right within the area of hydrologic
impact; and
(iv)  will not adversely affect the water quality of the aquifer;
(2)  shall condition any approval on acquiring the applicable water quality
permits prior to construction and operation of the recharge project; and
(3)  may attach to the permit any condition the state engineer determines is
appropriate.
